Hawaii, session 2026, HB2479.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that in 2025, the American Society of Civil Engineers released their infrastructure report card, in which the state received an overall grade of a D+.  This grade demonstrates the lack of improvement to Hawaii infrastructure, as the state received the same grade in 2019.  Most of Hawaii's infrastructure was built between sixty to one hundred years ago, which was not intended to have lasted this long.  These delayed maintenance and improvements are posing a threat and danger to many communities across the state. For communities, such as Waiʻanae, who continue to experience growth and developments, there is generated additional demand for water, sewage, recycling, solid water disposal services, communication, electricity, and other utility systems.  A lack of infrastructure readiness can hinder new developments and lead to increased costs for emergency repairs.  There is a need for information on the utility providers' ability to meet current and future demands.  This is essential to proactive maintenance, which can minimize long-term repair costs, extend asset life, and reduce safety risks.  It is crucial to have such data publicly available and updated for responsible community planning and dependable utility services. Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to require the Public Utility Commission to develop a temporary working group to study the current capacity of utility services, the expected lifespan of existing coastline infrastructure, and the financial implications of necessary expansions. SECTION 2.  (a) There is established a temporary working group within the public utility commission to study the current capacity of utility services, the expected lifespan of existing coastline utility infrastructure, and the financial implications of necessary expansions in counties with populations exceeding five hundred thousand.  The members of the working group shall include: (1)  The chairperson of the public utilities commission, or the chairperson's designee; (2)  The president and chief executive officer of Charter Communications, or their designee; (3)  Honolulu city councilmember representing district 1, or their designee; (4)  One representative of a telecommunications carrier; (5)  One member from each electric utility operating in the county; (6)  The chair of the Honolulu board of water supply, or their designee; (7)  A representative of the International Brotherhood of Electrical Workers, Local 1260; and (8)  The director of the city and county of Honolulu department of environmental services, or their designee. (c)  The working group may invite to serve on the working group any other persons whom the working group believes have expertise that would be helpful in fulfilling the working group's duties pursuant to subsection (d). (d)  The working group shall: (1)  Develop an assessment of the current capacity of existing infrastructure and actual demand; (2)  Develop an assessment of infrastructure nearing or at the end of their expected operational lifespan; (3)  Analyze the financial impact and necessary costs for expanding infrastructure to accommodate projected coastline community growth; (4)  Identify any existing plans for upgrades, including expected timelines and projected impacts on the community; (5)  Identify any information on budget allocations, potential funding gaps, and any anticipated rate increases to support expansion efforts; and (6)  Review whether approved permits have imposed an unreasonable strain on infrastructure capacity and whether any mitigation efforts are necessary to restore sufficient capacity. (e)  The county shall consider the report from the task force and the impact to infrastructure capacity prior to issuing any new permits. SECTION 3. The working group shall submit a report of its findings and recommendations, including any proposed legislation, to the legislature no later than twenty days prior to the convening of the regular session of 2027. SECTION 4.  This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________